Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 132
SALE OF PROPERTY

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Section

7-132-101. Sale of property.

Unless the bylaws otherwise provide, a nonprofit corporation may, as authorized by the board of directors:

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its property in the usual and regular course of business;

Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness, whether with or without recourse, or otherwise encumber all or substantially all of its property whether or not in the usual and regular course of business.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, approval by the members of a transaction described in this section is not required.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 717, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-132-102. Sale of property other than in regular course of activities.

A nonprofit corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property, with or without its good will, other than in the usual and regular course of business on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the board of directors, if the board of directors proposes and the members entitled to vote thereon approve the transaction. A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of a nonprofit corporation, with or without its good will, in connection with its dissolution, other than in the usual and regular course of business, and other than pursuant to a court order, shall be subject to the requirements of this section; but a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of a nonprofit corporation, with or without its good will, pursuant to a court order shall not be subject to the requirements of this section.

If a nonprofit corporation is entitled to vote or otherwise consent, other than in the usual and regular course of its business, with respect to the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property with or without the good will of another entity which it controls, and if the property interests held by the nonprofit corporation in such other entity constitute all, or substantially all, of the property of the nonprofit corporation, then the nonprofit corporation shall consent to such transaction only if the board of directors proposes and the members, if any are entitled to vote thereon, approve the giving of consent.

For a transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or a consent described in subsection (2) of this section to be approved by the members:

The board of directors shall recommend the transaction or the consent to the members unless the board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the members at a membership meeting with the submission of the transaction or consent; and

The members entitled to vote on the transaction or the consent shall approve the transaction or the consent as provided in subsection (6) of this section.

The board of directors may condition the effectiveness of the transaction or the consent on any basis.

The nonprofit corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-127-104 to each member entitled to vote on the transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or the consent described in subsection (2) of this section, of the members' meeting at which the transaction or the consent will be voted upon. The notice shall:

State that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider:

In the case of action pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of the nonprofit corporation; or

In the case of action pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the nonprofit corporation's consent to the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of another entity, which entity shall be identified in the notice, property interests of which are held by the nonprofit corporation and constitute all, or substantially all, of the property of the nonprofit corporation; and

Contain or be accompanied by a description of the transaction, in the case of action pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or by a description of the transaction underlying the consent, in the case of action pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Unless articles 121 to 137 of this title, the articles of incorporation, bylaws adopted by the members, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (4) of this section require a greater vote, the transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or the consent described in subsection (2) of this section shall be approved by the votes required by sections 7-127-205 and 7-127-206 by every voting group entitled to vote on the transaction or the consent.

After a transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or a consent described in subsection (2) of this section is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned or the consent withheld or revoked, subject to any contractual rights or other limitations on such abandonment, withholding, or revocation, without further action by the members.

A transaction that constitutes a distribution is governed by article 133 and not by this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 717, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.